Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska66-1514.01
Supplier, defined.

Supplier shall mean any person who owns petroleum products imported by barge, barge line, or pipeline and stored at a barge, barge line, or pipeline terminal in this state.

Laws 1994, LB 1160, § 118.